Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2703.01
Advanced telecommunications capability, defined.

Advanced telecommunications capability shall mean high-speed, broadband telecommunications capability that enables users to originate and receive high-quality voice, data, graphics, and video telecommunications using any technology.

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 12.